Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Native American Indian Rights

4-34-201. Inclusion of “Native American Indian” as racial or ethnic origin.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a state or local governmental entity requiring or requesting a person to divulge racial or ethnic origin on an employment form, education application, or other such document shall contain a space, box, or blank clearly designated “Native American Indian.”

This section may not be construed to require a governmental entity to revise the forms in the manner required by this section before exhausting its supply of forms on hand on January 1, 1995.

Acts 1994, ch. 971, § 1.

4-34-202. Eligibility for minority-based benefits.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a Native American or an African-American is eligible to receive scholarships, grants or any other benefit afforded to minorities from the University of Tennessee system, the board of regents system, or any Tennessee school system. As used in this section, “Native American” means an individual recognized as Native American by a federally recognized tribe or a state.

Acts 1994, ch. 972, § 1.